en: Honey-based preparations
de: Honigbasierte Zubereitung, Zubereitung auf Honigbasis
fi: Hunajavalmisteet
fr: Préparations à base de miel
hr: Pripravci na bazi meda
hu: Mézalapú készítmények
it: Preparati a base di miele
lt: Medaus pagrindo preparatai
nl: Bereidingen op basis van honing
pt: Preparações à base de mel

en: Blends of honey and propolis
de: Honig und Propolis Mischungen
fr: Préparations à base de miel et propolis, mélanges de miel et propolis
hr: Mješavine meda i propolisa
hu: Méz és propolisz keverékei
it: Miscele di miele e propoli, Mix di miele e propoli
nl: Mengsels van honing en propolis, Mengelingen van honing en propolis
pt: Misturas de mel e própolis

en: Honey and royal jelly mixtures
de: Honig und Gelée Royale Mischungen
fr: Préparations à base de miel et gelée royale, mélanges de miel et gelée royale
hr: Mješavine meda i matične mliječi
hu: Méz és méhpempő keverékei
it: Miscele a base di miele e pappa reale, Mix di miele e pappa reale
nl: Mengsels van honing en koninginnegelei, Mengelingen van koninginnegelei
pt: Misturas de mel e geleia real

en: Beverages and beverages preparations, Beverages and preparations
de: Getränke und Getränkezubereitungen
es: Bebidas y preparaciones de bebidas
fr: Boissons et préparations de boissons
hr: Pića i pripravci za piće
hu: Italok és italalapú készítmények, Italok és italkészítmények
it: Bevande e preparati per bevande
nl: Dranken en drankbereidingen
pl: Napoje i składniki do napojów
pt: Bebidas e preparações para bebidas
zh: 饮料及饮料备制品

en: Beverage preparations
de: Getränkezubereitungen
es: Preparaciones de bebidas
fr: Préparations pour boissons
hr: Pripravci za piće
hu: Italkészítmények
it: Preparati per bevande
nl: Drankbereidingen
pt: Preparações de bebidas
zh: 饮料调制品

en: Beverages, Drinks
bg: Напитки
ca: Begudes
cs: Nápoje
da: Drikkevarer, Drikkevare, Drikke, Drik
de: Getränke
el: Ποτά
es: Bebidas
et: Joogid
fi: Juomat
fr: Boissons
he: משקאות
hr: Pića
hu: Italok
it: Bevande
ja: 飲料
ko: 음료
lt: Gėrimai
lv: Dzērieni
nl: Dranken, Drank
no: Drikkevarer
pl: Napoje, Napój
pt: Bebidas
ro: Băuturi, Bauturi
rs: Pića
ru: Напитки
se: Drycker, dryck
sk: Nápoje
sl: Pijače
sv: Dryckor, Dricka, Dryck, Drycker
th: เครื่องดื่ม
tr: İçecekler
uk: Напої
zh: 饮料, 飲品

en: Beverage variety packs
de: Getränke Mischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de bebidas
fr: Assortiments de boissons
hr: Pakiranja raznih pića
hu: Italválogatások
it: Confezioni miste di bevande
nb: Drikker flerpakk
nl: Drankassortimenten
pt: Packs variados de bebidas
sv: Drycker blandförpackningar

en: Half iced tea and half lemonade
pt: Meio chá gelado e meia limonada

en: Fermented foods
ar: الأطعمة المخمرة
as: পাকস্থলীয় খাদ্য
az: Fermentlənmiş qida
bg: Ферментирали продукти
bn: পাকস্থলীয় খাদ্য
ca: Aliments fermentats
cs: Kvašené potraviny
cy: Bwydydd wedi'u fferyllu
da: Fermenterede fødevarer
de: Fermentierte Lebensmittel
eo: Fermentitaj manĝaĵoj
es: Comidas fermentadas, Alimentos fermentados
fa: غذاهای تخمیر شده
fi: Hapatetut ruoat
fr: Produits fermentés
ga: Bia fíonta
he: מזון מותסס
hi: ज़रूरत से अधिक खाद्य
hr: Fermentirana hrana
hu: Fermentált ételek, Erjesztett ételek
id: Makanan Fermentasi
it: Cibi fermentati
ja: 発酵食品
kn: ಕಂದಿತ ಆಹಾರ
ko: 발효 식품
lt: Fermentuoti maisto produktai, Rauginti maisto produktai
mr: जवळचा अन्न
ms: Makanan Fermentasi
nl: Gefermenteerde levensmiddelen
no: Fermentert mat
pa: ਜ਼ਰੂਰਤ ਤੋਂ ਜ਼ਿਆਦਾ ਖਾਣ-ਪੀਣ
pl: Żywność fermentowana
pt: Alimentos Fermentados
ro: Alimente fermentate
ru: Ферментированные пищевые продукты
sr: Ферментисана храна
sv: Fermenterad mat
ta: பச்சையாக்கப்பட்ட உணவுகள்
te: ఆకుపచ్చ ఆహారాలు
th: อาหารหมัก
tl: Pagkaing Fermented
tr: Fermente gıdalar, Mayalanmış gıdalar, Mayalı gıdalar
uk: Ферментовані продукти
vi: Thực phẩm lên men
zh: 发酵食品

en: Kimchi
xx: Kimchi
ar: كمتشي
as: কিমচি
az: Kimçi
bg: Кимчи
bn: কিমচি
cs: Kimčchi
el: Κίμτσι
eo: Kimĉio
es: Kimchi
fa: کیمچی
he: קימצ'י
hi: किमची
hu: Kimcshi
hy: Կիմչի
id: Kimci
ja: キムチ
ka: კიმჩი
kk: Кимчи
km: គីមឈី
ko: 김치
lt: Kimči
lv: Kimči
mn: Кимчи
ms: Kimchi
my: ကင်ချီ
ru: Кимчхи
sk: Kimčchi
sl: Kimči
ta: கிம்ச்சி
th: กิมจิ
tl: Kimtsi
tr: Kimçi
uk: Кімчі
vi: Kim chi
zh: 韓式泡菜

en: Fermented drinks
ar: مشروبات مخمرة
az: ферментləşdirilmiş içkilər
bg: Ферментирали напитки
bn: গাঁজনযুক্ত পানীয়
ca: Begudes fermentades
cs: Fermentované nápoje
da: Fermenterede drikkevarer
de: Fermentierte Getränke
el: Ζυμωμένα ποτά
eo: Fermentitaj trinkaĵoj
es: Bebidas fermentadas
et: Fermenteeritud joogid
fa: نوشیدنی های تخمیر شده
fi: Hapatetut juomat
fr: Boissons fermentées
ga: Deochanna coipthe
he: משקאות מותססים
hi: किण्वित पेय
hr: Fermentirana pića
hu: Fermentált italok, Erejesztett italok
id: Minuman fermentasi
it: Bevande fermentate
ja: 発酵飲料
ko: 발효 음료
lt: Rauginti gėrimai
mr: किण्वित पेय
ms: Minuman yang ditapai
nl: Gefermenteerde dranken
pl: Napoje fermentowane
pt: Bebidas fermentadas
ro: Băuturi fermentate, Bauturi fermentate
ru: Ферментированные напитки
sr: Ферментисана пића
sv: Fermenterade drycker
th: เครื่องดื่มหมัก
tr: Fermente içecekler
uk: Ферментовані напої
vi: Đồ uống lên men
zh: 发酵饮料

en: Sweetened beverages, Sugared beverages, Beverages with added sugar
bg: Подсладени напитки
ca: Begudes ensucrades
cs: Slazené nápoje
da: Sødede drikkevarer, Sukkerholdige drikkevarer, Drikkevarer med tilsat sukker
de: Gezuckerte Getränke, Zuckerhaltige Getränke
es: Bebidas azucaradas
fi: Makeutetut juomat
fr: Boissons avec sucre ajouté, Boissons sucrées
he: משקאות מתוקים, משקאות ממותקים
hr: Zaslađena pića
hu: Cukrozott italok, Édesített italok, Italok hozzáadott cukorral
it: Bevande zuccherate
lt: Saldinti gėrimai, Gėrimai su pridėtiniu cukrumi
nl: Gesuikerde dranken
pl: Napoje słodzone, Napoje z dodatkiem cukru
pt: Bebidas adoçadas, Bebidas açucaradas, Bebidas com adição de açúcar
ro: Băuturi dulci, Băuturi cu zahăr, Bauturi dulci, Bauturi cu zahar
ru: Напитки с добавлением сахара
th: น้ำหวาน
tr: Tatlı içecekler, Şekerli içecekler
zh: 含糖饮料

en: Artificially sweetened beverages
bg: Изкуствено подсладени напитки
ca: Begudes ensucrades artificialment
da: Kunstigt sødede drikkevarer
de: Getränke mit Süßstoff, Süßstoffhaltige Getränke
es: Bebidas endulzadas artificialmente
fi: keinotekoisesti makeutetut juomat
fr: Boissons édulcorées, boissons aux édulcorants
he: משקאות עם המתקה מלאכותית
hr: Umjetno zaslađena pića
hu: Mesterségesen édesített italok
it: Bevande artificialmente zuccherate, Bevande artificialmente dolcificate, Bevande artificialmente edulcorate
lt: Gėrimai su dirbtiniais saldikliais
nl: Kunstmatig gezoete dranken
pl: Napoje sztucznie słodzone, Napoje ze sztucznymi słodzikami
pt: Bebidas artificialmente doçeadas
ro: Băuturi îndulcite artificial, Băuturi cu îndulcitori artificiali, Bauturi indulcite artificial, Bauturi cu indulcitori artificiali
th: เครื่องดื่มผสมน้ำตาลเทียม
zh: 人工甜味剂饮料

en: Unsweetened beverages, Non-sugared beverages, beverages without added sugar
bg: Неподсладени напитки
ca: Begudes sense sucre
de: Ungezuckerte Getränke, Ungesüßte Getränke
es: Bebidas no azucaradas
fi: makeuttamattomat juomat
fr: Boissons sans sucre ajouté, Boissons non sucrées
he: משקאות בלתי ממותקים
hr: Nezaslađenih pića
hu: Édesítetlen italok, Hozzáadott cukrot nem tartalmazó italok
it: Bevande senza zucchero
lt: Nesaldinti gėrimai, gėrimai be pridėtinio cukraus
nl: Suikervrije dranken, Ongesuikerde dranken
pl: Napoje niesłodzone, Napoje bez cukru, Napoje bez dodatku cukru
pt: Bebidas não adoçadas, Bebidas não açucaradas, bebidas sem açucar adicionado
ro: Băuturi fără zahăr, Băuturi fără zahăr adăugat, Bauturi fara zahar, Bauturi fara zahar adaugat
ru: Напитки без добавления сахара
th: เครื่องดื่มไม่เติมน้ำตาล
zh: 无糖饮料

en: Alcoholic beverages, Alcoholic drinks, drinks with alcohol, alcohols
bg: Алкохолни напитки
ca: Begudes alcohòliques
cs: Alkoholické nápoje
da: Alkoholiske drikke, alkohol
de: Alkoholische Getränke
es: Bebidas alcohólicas
fi: alkoholijuomat
fr: Boissons alcoolisées, boisson alcoolisée, alcool, alcools
he: משקאות אלכוהוליים
hr: Alkoholna pića
hu: Alkoholos italok, Alkohol tartalmú italok, Alkoholok
it: Bevande alcoliche
ja: 酒
lt: Alkoholiniai gėrimai, gėrimai su alkoholiu, alkoholis
nl: Alcoholische dranken
pl: Napoje alkoholowe, Alkohole
pt: Bebidas alcoólicas, bebidas com álcool, álcoois
ro: Băuturi alcoolice, Bauturi alcoolice
rs: Alkoholna pića
ru: Алкогольные напитки, Спиртные напитки
sv: Alkoholdrycker, Rusdrycker, Drycker med alkohol
th: เครื่องดื่มแอลกอฮอล์
tr: Alkollü içecekler
zh: 酒, 酒水, 酒饮料

en: Non grape alcoholic beverages
pt: Bebidas alcoólicas sem uva

en: Alcohol making kits
de: Alkoholherstellungskits
es: Kits para hacer alcohol
fr: Kits de fabrication d'alcool
hr: Pribor za pravljenje alkohola
it: Kit per la produzione di alcolici
nl: Alcohol maak kits
pt: Kits para fazer álcool
zh: 酿酒套件

en: Alcoholic beverages variety packs
de: Alkoholische Getränke Mischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de bebidas alcohólicas
fr: Assortiments de boissons alcoolisées
hr: Pakiranja raznih alkoholnih pića
hu: Alkoholosital-válogatások, Alkoholos ital válogatások
it: Confezioni miste di bevande alcoliche
nb: Alkoholholdige drikker flerpakk
nl: Alcoholische drankassortimenten
pt: Packs variados de bebidas alcoólicas
sv: Blandförpackningar

en: Flavoured Drinks
de: Aromatisierte Getränke
es: Bebidas con sabor
fr: Boissons aromatisées
hr: Aromatizirana pića
hu: Ízesített italok
it: Bevande aromatizzate
nl: Smaakdranken
pt: Bebidas aromatizadas

en: Premixed alcoholic beverages
de: Fertig gemischte alkoholische Getränke
es: Bebidas alcohólicas premezcladas
fr: Boissons alcoolisées pré-mélangées
hr: Prethodno miješana alkoholna pića
hu: Előkevert alkoholos italok
it: Bevande alcoliche pre-miscelate
nl: Voorgemengde alcoholische dranken
pt: Bebidas alcoólicas pré-misturadas